dictsource/hu_rules
.group sz
        sz         s
        szts       stS:
  para) szts (onk  st|S      //parasztsonkword need spokening st and single S phoneme
        sztsz      st|s
        sztsze     stsE
        sztsza     stsA
        sz (öld    Sz
    va) sz (abl    S||z
   egé) szs (ég    S
liszte) szs (ák    SZ
  rend) sz (er     s:
krumpli) szs (ák   SZ
szerszámo) szs (ák SZ
  maro) sz (ug     Sz
  körö) sz (ug     Sz
fáklyá) sz (ene    Sz
 hallá) sz (avar   Sz
   evé) sz (avar   Sz
  vonó) sz (ene    Sz
    va) sz (ár     Sz
kenyere) szs (ák   SZ
 sonká) szs (eml   SZ
  vize) szs (em    SZ
   iga) szs (ágos  S:
    li) sztsz (erű st|s
  tava) sz (ára    s
rongyo) szs (ák    SZ
  para) sztsz (ek  st|s
  rava) sz (ár     s
   _ka) sztsze     st|sE
szemete) szs (ák   SZ
   dro) sztsze (rző st|sE    //drosztszerződés word need spokening st and single sE phoneme
 _búzá) szs (ák    SZ
_szene) szs (ák    SZ
_szalmá) szs (ák   SZ
    va) szs (anér  SZ
gaboná) szs (ák    SZ
    va) sz (ápor   Sz
  bati) sztsz (erű st|s
  para) sztsz (andál st|s
    te) szts (oroz st|S
 _dama) szts       st|S
  kere) szt (sor   st
  kere) szt (szer  st
  para) szt (segg  st
  azbe) szt (sisak st
   nyu) szt (süveg st
 serté) szs (ír    SZ
 szere) szs (ák    SZ
 rizse) szs (ák    SZ
    tá) szs (in    SZ
  ruhá) szs (ák    SZ
    ro) szs (ák    SZ
    va) szs (ír    SZ
 széná) szs (ák    SZ

.group t
        t          t
        t (-ty     c:
    t-) ty                   //silent with second ty phoneme



        ty (-ty    c:        //special rule, need pronouncing  one longer c: phoneme
   ty-) ty                   //not need spokening second c phoneme
        tty (L01   c
        tt (-ty    c:        //special cases with uncommon words
   tt-) ty                   //silent with second ty phoneme
        tt (L01    t
        tt (-L01   t         //if have consonant after - character, need spokening one t letter with another not defined grammatical cases
        tt (-t     t:
   tt-) t                    //second part not need spokening the t phoneme
        t (-t      t:        // use long [t:], not two [t]
    t-) t                    // silent after 'tt-'

     -) t (_       t
     _) t (_       te:
        tc         ts:
    ne) t (c       t
     á) t (caplat  t
tábláza) t (cell   t
négyze) t (centi   t
  tesz) t (cikk    t
     á) t (cikáz   t
        t (cs      t
  tesz) t (cél     t
terüle) t (cél     t
fejeze) t (cím     t
     á) t (cím     t
        természetes tER2me:sEtES
     a) th (én     t
        thököly    tYkYli
        ty         c
  nosz) ty         ti
vörösmar) ty       ti
     ö) t (yard    t
     C) tyj        c
     A) tyj (A     c:
   _ka) ty (n      ti
     @) tól (_S3q  to:l
     @) től (_S3q  tY:l
  spor) t (cent    t         //for example sportcentrum word need spokening single t and ts phoneme
használ) t (cikk   t
 grafi) t (ceruz   t         //for example grafitceruzával, grafitceruze need spokening single t before c letter
  pamu) t (cér     t
    ha) t (cell    t         //for example hatcellás, hatcella word need spokening t before c letter.
   pár) t (székház t
hálóza) t (semleges t
 vajon) t (szoros  t
        tsz (h     ts
    te) tsz (h     ts
    _á) t (szolgáltat t

tizenké) t (szél   t
skarlá) t (szín    t
    já) tsz (d     ts
  pamu) t (szok    t
  jára) t (szolgál t
 perme) t (szerű   t
  mamu) t (szőr    t
 csapa) t (szolg   t
  ezüs) t (szőke   t
 broká) t (sz      t
   _kö) tsz (er    ts:
  _tes) t (szőr    t
 _söté) t (szők    t
kísérte) t (század t
  söté) t (szob    t
elefán) t (szőr    t
  _saj) t (szín    t
   _pó) t (szolgál t
_viszon) t (szolgál t
 _álla) t (szob    t
  cson) t (sovány  t
 szöve) t (sáv     t
  fron) t (sebész  t
   éle) t (sorvasz t
_szaki) ts (on     tS:
   szé) t (sugár   t
  cson) t (sárga   t
  _taf) t (sely    t
 broká) t (sely    t
  álla) t (sebész  t
patyola) t (sely   t
házasi) ts (a      tS:
  sajá) t (szerű   t
_pázsi) t (sz      t
fejeze) t (sor     t
    _o) ttj (ár    tj
 _spor) t (cél     t
    pó) t (selejt  t
  diva) t (cikk    t
 küldö) tt (gyűl   t
   szé) t (söpör   t
rokkan) t (segít   t

.group tj
     C) tj         c
   kür) tj         c
  cson) tj         c
  ezüs) tj         c
  üzle) tj         c:
     A) tj (A      c:
     ú) tj (aví    tj
    pó) tj (e      tj
  mene) tj (eggy   tj
  mene) tj (egy    tj
  vona) tj (egy    tj
 bérle) tj (egy    tj
     ö) tj (egyű   tj
    ha) tj (egyű   tj
    hé) tj (egyű   tj
    ké) tj (egyű   tj
        tj (el     tj        //need this general rule when any not added word contains the tjel part
   kür) tj (el     tj
   éle) tj (el     tj
 csapa) tj (el     tj
 szüne) tj (el     tj
billentyűze) tj (el tj
fejeze) tj (el     tj
folyama) tj (el    tj
gondola) tj (el    tj
hangula) tj (el    tj
helyze) tj (el     tj
állapo) tj (el     tj
    _á) tj (elentkez tj
     ú) tj (elzés  tj
     ú) tj (elző   tj
     ú) tj (og     tj
   ese) tj (og     tj
    lé) tj (ogosultság tj
  néme) tj (uhá    tj
   skó) tj (uhász  tj
     á) tj (uss    tj
     á) tj (ut     tj
  szen) tj (ános   tj
     á) tj (ár     t|j
    gá) tj (ár     c:
    há) tj (ár     c:
  bará) tj (ár     c:        //barátjára, barátjáról words need spokening c: phoneme
  fron) tj (ár     tj
 korlá) tj (ára    c:
   éle) tj (áradék tj
     á) tjátssz    tja:ts:
     á) tjátsz     tja:ts:
   hol) tj (áték   tj
   tes) tj (áték   tj
 csapa) tj (áték   tj
     á) tj (ö      tj
     á) tj (öhe    tj
    _á) tj (öj     tj
     á) tj (ön     tj
     á) tj (öt     tj
  spor) tj (áték   tj
rokkan) tj (áradék tj
interne) tj (egy   tj
  álla) tj (ólét   tj
dolgoza) tj (avít  tj
természe) tj (ár   tj
terüle) tj (elöl   tj
    _á) tj (u      tj
_tábláza) tj (egy  tj
 üzene) tj (el     tj

.group ts
        ts (_S2    tS        //general rule with word end of ts letters
        ts (a      tS
        ts (á      tS
        ts (e      tS
        ts (é      tS
        ts (o      tS
        ts (u      tS
        tsü        tSy
   apá) ts (ág     tS:
becsüle) ts (é     t|S       // "becsületsértés"  need spokening  [t] and [S], not [tS]
  bizo) ts (ág     tS:
  cson) ts (ér     t|S       // eg. "csontsérülés" word need [t] and [S], not [tS]
 gyapo) tsz        t|s       // eg. "gyapotszőttes", "gyapotszövet"
    já) tsz (A     ts:
    já) tssz       ts:
    já) tsz (m     ts
    já) tsz (hat   ts
    já) tsz (v     ts
        tsz (_S3   ts:
        tsz (é     ts:
        tsz (o     ts:
        tsz (ő     ts:
        tszó (_S4  ts:o:
        tsz (a     t|s
        tsz (e     t|s
        tsz (á     t|s
kegyele) ts (ér    t|S       //eg "kegyeletsértés" need  single [t] and [S], not [tS]
    me) tsz (et    ts:
   min) ts (em     t|S       //mintsem word
    ké) tsz (er    ts:
     ö) tsz (ör    ts:
    hé) tsz (er    ts:
 szorí) ts (a      tS:
   sie) ts         tS:
   ürí) ts (e      tS:
  mula) ts         tS:
 nemze) ts         tS:
  néme) ts (ég     tS:
        tsd        tSd
  bará) ts         tS:
   dön) ts (ön     tS
  köve) ts (ég     tS:
  neve) ts (ég     tS:
        tsö        tSY
     j) ts         tS
  állí) ts         tS:
   szé) tszé       t|se:
 szöve) ts (ég     tS:
  söté) ts (ég     tS:
  sajá) ts (ág     tS:
  lehe) ts (ég     tS:
  tehe) ts (ég     tS:
    lá) tsz (A     ts:
    lá) tssz (on   ts:
    lá) tssz (anak ts:
    te) tsz        ts:
  fize) ts (ég     tS:
  segí) ts         tS:
     á) ts (ó      tS:
ismere) ts (ég     tS:
    vé) ts (ég     tS:
    fű) ts         tS:
 halla) tsz (ik    ts:
    ké) ts (ég     tS:
   ére) ts (ég     tS:
   men) ts (vár    tS
  süke) ts (ég     tS:
     ú) tsz (él    t|s
becsüle) tsz (ó    t|s
indula) tsz (ó     t|s
  cson) tsz (én    t|s
   dró) tsz (őr    t|s
    lá) tsz (erész t|s
   skó) tsz (okny  t|s
  söté) tsz (őke   t|s
     á) ts (é      t|S
 halla) tssz (on   ts:
    me) tsz (ik    ts:
    me) tsz (e     ts:
    hű) ts         tS:
 huncu) ts (ág     tS:
  segi) ts (é      tS:
   kür) tsz (ó     t|s
    hi) tsz (ó     t|s
     á) tsz (ok    t|s
 halla) tsz (a     ts:
 fejle) ts (ég     tS:
   sie) tsz        ts:
 szemé) ts (ég     tS:
    ré) ts (ég     tS:
    já) tsz (ok    ts:
  álla) ts (ág     tS:
köteleze) ts (ég   tS:
  kötö) ts (ég     tS:
    me) tsz (ve    ts
    me) tssz (e    ts:
    me) tssz (ük   ts:
   _lá) tssz (ék   ts:
munkafüze) ts (abl t|S
   pár) ts (ajtó   t|S
 szöve) ts (apk    t|S
   skó) ts (apka   t|S
    ké) ts (arkú   t|S
    ké) ts (arok   t|S
 épüle) ts (arok   t|S
 épüle) ts (arok   t|S
    mi) ts (e      t|S
    ne) ts (e      t|S
 korán) ts (e      t|S
  söré) ts (eb     t|S
    bi) ts (ebesség t|S
    ké) ts (ebességes t|S
     á) ts (egít   t|S
dagana) ts (ej     t|S
     á) ts (ejle   t|S
  álla) ts (ereg   t|S
  bozó) ts (o      t|S
mozdula) ts (o     t|S
    _á) ts (odor   t|S
     á) ts (or     t|S
    ké) ts (or     t|S
  mene) ts (or     t|S
  tesz) ts (or     t|S
  üzle) ts (or     t|S
 szige) ts (or     t|S
felada) ts (or     t|S
   ada) ts         t|S       //for example adatsor, adatsebesség words
   ada) tsz        t|s       //for example adatszolgáltatás word
gondola) ts (or    t|S
művele) ts (o      t|S
tábláza) ts (or    t|S
vizsgála) ts (or   t|S
állapo) ts (or     t|S
vizsgála) ts (oroza t|S
kísérle) ts (orozat t|S
   boo) ts (orrend t|S
   zár) ts (orú    t|S
 nemze) ts (traté  t|S
     á) ts (ug     t|S
    kú) ts (ug     t|S
 kobal) ts (ugár   t|S
     á) ts (uh     t|S
     á) ts (ur     t|S
     á) tsz (a     t|s
     á) tsz (e     t|s
    hi) tsz (e     t|s
    lá) tsz (e     t|s
    ne) tsz (o     t|s
 nemze) tsz (o     t|s
   _ké) tsz (ob    t|s
  szen) tsz (obrok t|s
többle) tsz (ol    t|s
  fron) tsz (olgál t|s
  spor) tsz (olgál t|s
szerete) tsz (olgálat t|s
   ada) tsz (olgáltat t|s
   ker) tsz (omszéd t|s
     ú) tsz (oros  t|s
   ben) tsz (orul  t|s
    lé) tsz (ám    t|s
     ö) tsz (áz    t|s
    ha) tsz (áz    t|s
    hé) tsz (áz    t|s
    ké) tsz (áz    t|s
  kabá) tsz (é     t|s
  szen) tsz (ék    t|s
    há) tsz (él    t|s
   pán) tsz (él    t|s
  mene) tsz (él    t|s
passzá) tsz (él    t|s
    ké) tsz (ín    t|s
   lan) tsz (ó     t|s
     á) tsz (ö     t|s
   sej) tsz (ö     t|s
     á) tsz (ú     t|s
     á) tsz (ő     t|s
     á) tsz (ű     t|s
   _há) ts (ág     tS:
 huncu) ts (ág     t|S
   hol) ts (ápadt  t|S
    ne) ts (átor   t|S
    _ú) ts (áv     t|S
    ha) ts (áv     t|S
    ké) ts (áv     t|S
   par) ts (áv     t|S
folyama) ts (áv    t|S
művele) ts (áv     t|S
terüle) ts (áv     t|S
   tes) ts (ér     t|S
     á) ts (öprő   t|S
     á) ts (öpör   t|S
   dró) ts (övénny t|S
   dró) ts (övény  t|S
    gá) ts (üllyed t|S
     á) ts (ült    t|S
     á) ts (üt     t|S
     á) ts (üvít   t|S
   _pó) tsz (ék    t|s       //pótszék word for example need spokening single t and sz phoneme
    _ö) tsz (ob    t|s       //for example ötszobás word need spokening single t and sz letter
   _ha) tsz (ob    t|s       //same as prewious rule
   _hé) tsz (ob    t|s       //same as prewious rule
gyakorla) ts (oroz t|S
támogato) ts (ág   tS:
    já) tsz (hass  ts
    ké) tsz (erep  t|s
    _á) tsz (orong t|s
    _á) tsz (orít  t|s
    _á) tsz (olgál t|s
felira) ts (áv     t|S
    pö) tsz (en    ts:

.group tt
        tt         t:
        ttgy       t:J
        ttj        c:
   ala) tt (jár    t
 krike) tt (játék  t
        ttr        tR2       //special exception with always need executing
helyeze) tt (ről   t:
        tts (á     tS:
  halo) tt (sápad  t
        tts (é     tS:
        tty        c:
        ttyj       c:
keresz) tt (űz     t:
    me) ttsz (et   ts:

.group u
        u          u
szovjet) u (nió    u:

.group ú
        ú          u:
     h) ú (szan    u
     h) ú (szas    u
     h) ú (szat    u
